Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1621.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 452. (a) The department shall develop and make available an informational addendum for each form issued, used, referenced or relied upon under this act for the suspension, modification or termination of compensation benefits. The addendum shall be made available in English, Spanish and any additional language determined by the department to be in significant use within this Commonwealth.(b) The informational addendum shall include, at a minimum, 1234567891011121314151617181920 the following:(1) A statement advising that important rights under this act, including the right to wage loss benefits and medical benefits, may be affected by inaction and that interpretation and translation services are available.(2) Contact information for accessing language assistance services, including a toll-free telephone number, email address, mailing address and any other means of communication deemed appropriate by the department.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1621PN1955 - 2 - 12345678910